Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4007
Meaning and effect of power of attorney.

The meaning and effect
of a power of attorney is determined by the law of the jurisdiction indicated
in the power of attorney and, in the absence of an indication of jurisdiction,
by the law of the jurisdiction in which the power of attorney was executed.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 7.